Colorado statutes. TITLE 35 Agriculture
ARTICLE 14 MEASUREMENT STANDARDS
35-14-123. Weighing and measuring device service providers - certification - fees - placing in service - rules.

No person, other than the owner, may repair, service, or place in service any commercial weighing or measuring device for which the owner must obtain a license to operate unless the person is certified by the commissioner as a commercial weighing and measuring device service provider. The commissioner may specify the requirements for certification of service providers by rule. For the purposes of this section, only one certificate is required for each business employing service persons. The application for a commercial weighing and measuring device service provider certificate shall be submitted to the commissioner on forms furnished by the commissioner and shall be accompanied by a fee established by the commission. All certificates shall expire on the date specified by the commissioner by rule. A provider who fails to renew a certificate on or before the expiration date of the certificate shall pay a late fee, as established by the commission, in addition to the certificate fee.

The commissioner shall adopt rules specifying:

The categories and requirements for certification of commercial weighing and measuring device service providers; and

The performance requirements for commercial weighing and measuring devices service providers.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 331, § 18, effective April 2, 2009.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 331, § 18, effective April 2, 2009.)

Each commercial weighing or measuring device not exempted pursuant to section 35-14-126 that is placed in service by a commercial weighing and measuring device service provider shall comply with section 35-14-105. When repairing, servicing, or placing in service any such device, a commercial weighing and measuring device service provider shall comply with the most current version of the national institute of standards and technology handbook 44, "Specifications, Tolerances, and Other Technical Requirements for Commercial Weighing and Measuring Devices".

No commercial weighing and measuring device service provider may use a standard when repairing, servicing, or placing in service a commercial weighing or measuring device that is not exempted pursuant to section 35-14-126 unless the commissioner has approved the standard.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 331, § 18, effective April 2, 2009.)

Each commercial weighing and measuring device service provider shall at least annually submit all standards used to repair, service, or place in service any commercial weighing or measuring device not exempted pursuant to section 35-14-126 to the laboratory for approval pursuant to section 35-14-128; except that, if such standards are annually approved in another state by that state's national institute of standards and technology-recognized metrology laboratory and evidence is shown of current approval, traceable to standards of the national institute of standards and technology, which is less than a year after date of issuance, the commissioner may exempt the service provider from obtaining a Colorado approval for the current year.

Upon placing in service any commercial weighing or measuring device not exempted pursuant to section 35-14-126, the service provider shall submit a placing-in-service report to the commissioner within ten days after the placing-in-service date. The commissioner shall promulgate rules to specify the information to be included in placing-in-service reports.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 331, § 18, effective April 2, 2009.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 95, p. 896, 8, effective July 1, 1995.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 331, § 18, effective April 2, 2009.)

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a person from performing repairs or service on a weighing or measuring device that the commissioner has condemned or placed under work order, but such person may not remove any tag placed on any weighing or measuring device pursuant to this article.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1350, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 490, § 39, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1), IP(2), (3), (5), (6), (7), (9), and (10) amended, p. 896, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 331, § 18, effective April 2.

Editor's note:

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2028, pursuant to § 35-14-134.

35-14-124. Inaccurate devices - stickers - tags - wire seals - rules.

A blue tag indicating "Work Order" shall be placed on any commercial weighing or measuring device that in the judgment of the commissioner is out of tolerance or in need of minor repairs. Repairs shall be made within thirty days, and, if not so made, the device shall be removed from commercial use. If the repairs cannot be completed or the device cannot be placed into service due to delay in obtaining parts or other justified circumstances, the commissioner may extend the time limit for repair or placing in service for a reasonable time.

A red tag indicating "CONDEMNED" shall be placed on any commercial weighing or measuring device that is to be removed from use. A wire seal may be so placed as to make the device unusable in any form. A device that has been condemned pursuant to this subsection (2) shall not be used for any commercial purpose.

A tag indicating "no license fee paid" shall be placed on any commercial weighing or measuring device that the owner is not licensed to operate. A wire seal may be so placed as to make the device unusable in any form. A device on which a "no license fee paid" tag has been placed shall not be used for any commercial purpose. A "no license fee paid" tag need not be placed on devices that are being held for resale and are not being used.

When a weighing or measuring device is found in a commercial establishment, it shall be prima facie evidence that said device is being used or employed. If the owner of any such device does not have a license for its use, the device shall have a "no license fee paid" or "not approved for commercial use" tag attached.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 333, § 19, effective April 2, 2009.)

The commissioner shall promulgate rules to clarify the circumstances under which a blue or red tag should be issued.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1352, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended and (5) added, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, pp. 333, 323, §§ 19, 5, effective April 2.

35-14-124.5. Disciplinary powers.

The commissioner may deny an application for, refuse to renew, revoke, or suspend a license or certificate or place a licensee or certificate holder on probation, if such person has:

Violated any provision of this article or of any rule adopted by the commissioner under this article;

Been convicted of a felony under any state or federal law; except that, in considering a conviction of a felony, the commissioner shall be governed by section 24-5-101, C.R.S.;

Committed fraud or deception in the procurement or attempted procurement of a license or certificate;

Failed to comply with a lawful order of the commissioner concerning the administration of this article;

Been convicted of deceptive trade practices under any state or federal law;

Used a commercial weighing or measuring device or moisture-testing device in deceptive trade practices in violation of any state or federal law.

All proceedings concerning the denial, refusal to renew, revocation, or suspension of a license or certificate or the placing of a licensee or certificate holder on probation shall be conducted pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

Any previous violation of this article by an applicant or associate of the applicant shall be sufficient grounds for denial of a license. For purposes of this subsection (3), "associate" means:

A person associated with the applicant in the business for which such applicant seeks to be licensed or certified;

A partner, officer, director, or stockholder of more than thirty percent of the outstanding shares of a partnership or corporation, when such partnership or corporation is the applicant.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 899, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1)(f) amended, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 334, § 20, effective April 2.

Editor's note:

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2028, pursuant to § 35-14-134.

35-14-125. Household scales. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1352, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section repealed, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 334, § 21, effective April 2.

35-14-126. Commercial weighing device exemption - licensing - testing.

No license shall be required for the use of the following commercial weighing or measuring devices and such devices shall be exempt from testing:

Person weighers also referred to as pennyweight scales;

Any scale used as an in-plant scale to determine ingredients or other such services where the end product or service is determined by some means other than the in-plant scale;

Those scales operated by the United States postal service;

Postal scales used exclusively for determining postage fees and where final determination of weight is made by the United States postal service;

A pharmacist's prescription scale having less than a four-ounce capacity;

Any other device exempted by the commissioner by rule.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1353, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

IP(1) amended and (1)(f) added, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 334, § 22, effective April 2.

35-14-127. Licenses - fees - rules - stickers - certificates.

Before operating any scale, textile meter, or cordage meter for commercial purposes, except those exempted in section 35-14-126, the owner shall first procure from the department a license for the operation of the device. All such licenses shall expire on the date established by the commissioner by rule.

Any person desiring to obtain a license for the operation of a scale, textile meter, or cordage meter shall file an application with the department upon a form furnished by the commissioner, which shall contain such information as the commissioner may require. Every application for a license shall be accompanied by the proper fee. A person who fails to renew a license on or before the expiration date of the license shall pay a late fee, as established by the commission, in addition to the license fee.

The commissioner shall test or cause to be tested for accuracy every scale, textile meter, or cordage meter for which the owner has been issued a license to operate at least once every twelve months or more often if necessary. Upon testing and approving a device for use, the commissioner shall affix an approval sticker to the device and may issue a device identification number. If the design, construction, or location of any scale, textile meter, or cordage meter is such as to require a testing procedure involving special equipment or accessories or an abnormal amount of labor, such equipment, accessories, and labor shall be supplied by the licensed owner of the scale, textile meter, or cordage meter as required by the commissioner. Nothing in this section shall prevent an inspector from testing a scale, textile meter, or cordage meter before the issuance of a license if the license fee is paid or is in the process of being paid.

The commission shall establish annual license fees for the operation of commercial weighing and measuring devices based on the number, capacity, and types of devices.
(4) (a) (I) The commission shall establish annual license fees for the operation of commercial weighing and measuring devices based on the number, capacity, and types of devices.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 1905, § 8, effective July 1, 2007.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 1905, § 8, effective July 1, 2007.)

The capacity of a given scale shall be determined by the manufacturer's rated capacity.

The annual license fee for belt conveyor and in-motion railroad scales shall be as determined by the commission.

The commission shall determine the annual license fee for textile meters, cordage meters, moisture meters, grain protein analyzers, certified weighers, persons who sell or install weighing and measuring devices, and persons who service weighing and measuring devices.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 1905, § 8, effective July 1, 2007.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 1905, § 8, effective July 1, 2007.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 1905, § 8, effective July 1, 2007.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 1905, § 8, effective July 1, 2007.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2007, p. 1905, § 8, effective July 1, 2007.)

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2009, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 334, § 23, effective April 2, 2009.)

The fees for inspection and testing pursuant to section 35-14-107 (2) shall be as determined by the commission.

(12.5) (a) For the fiscal year commencing on July 1, 2007, and for each subsequent fiscal year, the commission shall establish fees associated with the licensing, testing, inspection, and regulation of scales with a capacity of one thousand pounds or less, cordage meters, and textile meters. Such fees shall cover the direct and indirect costs of administering and enforcing this article other than subsection (12) of this section, paragraph (b) of this subsection (12.5), and section 35-14-128 (2).

For each fiscal year, commencing on July 1, twenty-five percent of the direct and indirect costs associated with the licensing, testing, inspection, and regulation of certified weighers, scales with a capacity of greater than one thousand pounds, belt conveyers, in-motion railroad scales, moisture-testing devices, and grain protein analyzers must be funded from the general fund. The commission shall establish a fee schedule to cover any direct and indirect costs not funded from the general fund.

Repealed.

All license fees and testing fees collected by the department under this article shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the inspection and consumer services cash fund created in section 35-1-106.5.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1353, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2), (4)(a), (4)(c), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (12), and (13) amended and (4)(a.5) added, p. 1728, § 11, effective May 14.

L. 2005:

IP(4)(a)(I), IP(4)(a.5), (4)(c), (5), (6), (7), (8), (9), (10), (12), and (13) amended, p. 1270, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2006:

(4)(a)(II) amended, p. 1516, § 85, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

IP(4)(a)(I), (4)(a)(II), (4)(a.5), (4)(c), (5) to (10), (12), and (13) amended and (12.5) added, p. 1905, § 8, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

(1), (2), (3), (4)(a)(I), (4)(c), (5), (11), (12), and (12.5) amended, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 334, § 23, effective April 2.

L. 2010:

(12.5)(b) amended, (HB 10-1377), ch. 212, p. 922, § 3, effective May 6.

L. 2011:

(5), (12.5)(b)(I), and (12.5)(b)(II)(A) amended, (HB 11-1159), ch. 95, p. 280, § 3, effective August 10.

L. 2020:

(12.5)(b)(I) amended, (SB 20-136), ch. 70, p. 296, § 45, effective September 14.

35-14-128. Laboratory approval - service - condemnation.

The commissioner may inspect and test any weights, measures, or standards submitted to the metrology laboratory. Weights, measures, and standards may not be approved by the department's laboratory unless the design and construction of the unit complies with the design and construction requirements prescribed by the national institute of standards and technology or other entity approved by the commissioner. The commissioner may establish approval periods, conditions, and limitations by rule.

The laboratory may require that specified weights, measures, or standards submitted for calibration be cleaned or sanded, scraped, and painted before submission. The fee for any metrology service shall be established by the commission. For each fiscal year, commencing on July 1, seventy-five percent of the direct and indirect costs associated with metrology laboratory services, including the regulation of weighing and measuring device sales, installation, and service persons, shall be funded from the general fund. The commission shall establish a fee schedule to cover any direct and indirect costs not funded from the general fund.

Repealed.

The laboratory may seize any weight, measure, or standard that it deems not to be susceptible of repair. Within twenty-four hours after such seizure, the laboratory shall cause notice of such seizure to be served personally or by first-class mail upon the owner of such weight, measure, or standard, advising such owner of the seizure and of the laboratory's intention to destroy such weights, measures, or standards, pursuant to section 35-14-107 (1)(k). Such notice shall also state that the owner of such weights, measures, or standards may, within twenty days after the date of personal service or mailing, request in writing that the commissioner conduct a hearing to determine whether such weights, measures, or standards are not susceptible of repair. If a hearing is requested, it shall be conducted promptly, and the commissioner or the commissioner's designated agent shall preside over such hearing, and the laboratory shall take no further action pending such hearing. If a hearing is not requested, the seized weights, measures, or standards may be destroyed after the expiration of the twenty-day period.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1354, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1) amended, p. 899, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 1731, § 12, effective May 14.

L. 2005:

(2) amended, p. 1271, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(2) amended, p. 1907, § 9, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 336, § 25, effective April 2.

L. 2010:

(2) amended, (HB 10-1377), ch. 212, p. 922, § 4, effective May 6.

L. 2013:

(2)(a) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1698, § 109, effective August 7.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2)(b)(II) provided for the repeal of subsection (2)(b), effective July 1, 2012. (See L. 2010, p. 280.)

35-14-129. Moisture-testing devices and grain protein analyzers - specifications.

Before operating any moisture-testing device or grain protein analyzer for commercial use, the owner of the device or analyzer shall first procure a license for operation of the device or analyzer from the commissioner. An application for the license must be made upon a form furnished by the commissioner. A moisture-testing device or a grain protein analyzer is considered in commercial use if the results of the device or analyzer are a factor in determining:

The price of the commodity tested; or

For a moisture-testing device, the drying or other processing charge based upon moisture content of the commodity.

to (6) Repealed.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1355, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(2) to (6) repealed, p. 899, § 11, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

IP(1) amended, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 337, § 26, effective April 2.

L. 2011:

(1) amended, (HB 11-1159), ch. 95, p. 280, § 4, effective August 10.

Editor's note:

This section is repealed, effective September 1, 2028, pursuant to § 35-14-134.

35-14-130. Stop sale order.

The commissioner may issue warning notices to anyone who has not complied with this article and may establish a time period to correct any minor violation.

The commissioner may issue a stop sale order directing that any products not meeting the requirements of this article or the rules promulgated by the commissioner be taken off sale.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1356, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 337, § 27, effective April 2.

35-14-131. Civil penalties.

A person who violates any provision of this article or any rule adopted pursuant to this article is subject to a civil penalty, as determined by the commissioner or a court of competent jurisdiction. The maximum penalty shall not exceed seven hundred fifty dollars per violation; except that such penalty may be doubled if it is determined, after notice and an opportunity for hearing, that the person has violated the provision or rule for the second time. Each day the violation occurs shall constitute a separate violation.

No civil penalty may be imposed by the commissioner unless the person charged is given notice and opportunity for a hearing pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

If the commissioner is unable to collect such civil penalty or if a person fails to pay all or a set portion of the civil penalty as determined by the commissioner, the commissioner may bring suit to recover such amount plus costs and attorney fees by action in a court of competent jurisdiction.

Before imposing a civil penalty, the commissioner or a court of competent jurisdiction may consider the effect of such penalty on the business.

It is a violation for any person to:

Sell, offer, or expose for sale or hire or have in his or her possession for the purpose of selling or hiring an incorrect weight or measure or any device or instrument used or calculated to falsify any weight or measure;

Use, or possess for current use or for hire, in the buying or selling of any commodity or thing, in the computation of any basic charge or payment for services rendered on the basis of weight or measurement, or in the determination of weight or measurement when a charge is made for such determination, any weight or measure that is not approved by the commissioner or the commissioner's designated agent, unless specific written permission to use such weight or measure has been received from the commissioner;

Dispose of any rejected or condemned weight or measure in a manner contrary to law or rule;

Remove, break, or deface, contrary to law or rule, any tag, seal, or mark placed on any weight or measure pursuant to this article, except in the case of the commissioner or a service person, certified pursuant to section 35-14-123, performing duties provided for in this article or any rule adopted pursuant thereto;

Sell, or offer or expose for sale, less than the quantity such person represents of any commodity, thing, or service;

Take more than the quantity such person represents of any commodity, thing, or service when, as a buyer, such person furnishes the weight or measure by means of which the amount of the commodity, thing, or service is determined;

Keep for the purpose of sale, advertise or offer or expose for sale, or sell any commodity, thing, or service in a condition or manner contrary to the requirements of this article;

Use in retail trade, except in the preparation of packages put up in advance of sale and medical prescriptions, a weight or measure that is so positioned that its indications may not be accurately read and the weighing or measuring operation observed from some position that may reasonably be assumed by a customer; except that this paragraph (h) shall not apply to livestock scales used in any licensed yard selling livestock;

Violate any provision of this article or any rule promulgated under this article for which a specific penalty has not been prescribed;

Act as or represent oneself to be a certified weigher without being certified therefor, or for any certified weigher to: Falsely certify, represent, or record the weight of any load, or part of any load, or of any article whatsoever obtained from a commercial weighing and measuring device not exempted pursuant to section 35-14-126; falsely certify, represent, or record any net or gross weight required by this article to be in said certificate or record; refuse to weigh any article or thing that it is such person's duty to weigh; or refuse to state in any weight certificate anything required to be therein;

Alter a weight certificate, use or attempt to use any such certificate for any load or part of a load or for articles or things other than for which the certificate is given, or, after weighing and before the delivery of any articles or things so weighed, alter or diminish the quantity thereof;

Hinder or obstruct in any way the commissioner or the commissioner's authorized agent in the performance of the commissioner's official duties under this article;

Act as or represent oneself to be a certified weighing or measuring device service provider without being so certified.

A civil penalty collected under this section shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit it to the inspection and consumer services cash fund created in section 35-1-106.5. Penalties shall be determined by the commissioner or the commissioner's designee and may be collected by the department by action instituted in a court of competent jurisdiction for collection of such penalty. In determining the amount of any civil penalty to be assessed, the commissioner shall consider any relevant factors. The final decision of the commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall be subject to judicial review. If such an action is instituted for the collection of such penalty, the court may consider the appropriateness of the amount of the penalty if such issue is raised by the party against whom the penalty was assessed.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1356, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 95:

(1), (2)(b), (2)(d), (2)(e), (2)(f), (2)(j), (2)(l), (2)(m), and (3) amended, p. 899, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2003:

(3) amended, p. 1731, § 13, effective May 14.

L. 2005:

(3) amended, p. 1271, § 12, effective July 1.

L. 2007:

(3) amended, p. 1907, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 337, § 28, effective April 2.

35-14-132. Criminal penalties.

Any person who willfully makes, installs, sells or offers to sell, or uses or allows to be used on his or her weights or measures any counterfeit seal, or seal of the commissioner without proper authority, commits a civil infraction and shall be punished as provided in section 18-1.3-503.

The commissioner shall inform the district attorney of the proper district of any criminal violation of this article. It is the duty of each district attorney to whom the commissioner presents satisfactory evidence of any violation of this article to cause appropriate proceedings to be commenced and prosecuted in a court of competent jurisdiction. If the district attorney fails to so act within a reasonable time, the commissioner may notify and be represented by the attorney general.

All criminal fines imposed and collected for violations of the provisions of this article shall be paid into the county treasury for the use of the people of the county in which the offense was committed.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1357, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1548, § 308, effective October 1.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3277, § 620, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-14-132 as it existed prior to 1983.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2002 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 318, Session Laws of Colorado 2002.

35-14-133. Enforcement.

The commissioner or the commissioner's designee shall enforce this article.

Whenever the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe a violation of any provision of this article or any rule promulgated pursuant to this article has occurred and immediate enforcement is deemed necessary, the commissioner may issue a cease-and-desist order, which may require any person to cease violating any provision of this article or any rule promulgated pursuant to this article. Such cease-and-desist order shall set forth the provisions alleged to have been violated, the facts alleged to have constituted the violation, and the requirement that all actions cease forthwith. At any time after service of the order to cease and desist, the person may request, at the person's discretion, a hearing to be held within a reasonable period of time to determine whether such violation has occurred. Such hearing shall be conducted pursuant to article 4 of title 24, C.R.S., and shall be determined promptly.

Whenever the commissioner possesses sufficient evidence satisfactory to him or her indicating that a person has engaged in or is about to engage in an act or practice constituting a violation of this article or any rule or order adopted pursuant to this article, the commissioner may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction to temporarily or permanently restrain or enjoin the act or practice in question and to enforce compliance with this article or any rule or order adopted pursuant to this article. In any such action, the commissioner shall not be required to plead or prove irreparable injury or the inadequacy of the remedy at law. Under no circumstances shall the court require the commissioner to post a bond.

Source:

L. 83:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1358, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 340, § 29, effective April 2.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 35-14-134 as it existed prior to 1983.

35-14-134. Repeal of sections - review of functions.

Sections 35-14-102 (3), 35-14-121 to 35-14-124.5, 35-14-127, 35-14-129, and 35-14-131 (5)(d), (5)(j), and (5)(m) are repealed, effective September 1, 2028. Before the repeal, the licensing and certification functions of the department are scheduled for review in accordance with section 24-34-104.

Source:

L. 88:

Entire section added, p. 932, § 24, effective April 28.

L. 90:

Entire section amended, p. 333, § 19, effective April 3.

L. 91:

Entire section amended, p. 689, § 64, effective April 20.

L. 95:

Entire section amended, p. 901, § 13, effective July 1.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 628, § 35, effective August 4.

L. 2004:

Entire section amended, p. 349, § 17, effective July 1.

L. 2009:

Entire section amended, (SB 09-113), ch. 88, p. 322, § 1, effective April 2.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1146), ch. 377, p. 2282, § 2, effective June 6.